California, session 20252026, AB2748.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17929.1 is added to the Health and Safety Code, immediately following Section 17929, to read:17929.1. (a) (1)A new or existing affordable housing development for which a permit application is submitted between January 1, 2025, and December 31, 2030, 2028, shall be exempt from the comply with one of the following:(1) The requirements for installation of low power Level 2 or higher electric vehicle charging receptacles in Section 4.106.4.2.2 of Chapter 4 of the 2025 California Green Building Standards Code (Part 11 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations), including any subsequent editions and any other state or local building standards requiring the equivalent.(2) A new or existing affordable housing development for which a permit application is submitted between January 1, 2025, and December 31, 2030, shall comply with the The applicable requirements for installation of low power Level 2 or higher electric vehicle charging receptacles in the 2024 supplement to the 2022 edition of the California Green Building Standards Code (Part 11 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations).(b) For purposes of this section, “affordable housing development” means a housing development project in which 100 percent of the units, excluding managers’ units, are restricted by deed, regulatory restriction contained in an agreement with a governmental agency, or other recorded document, as affordable housing for persons and families of low or moderate income, as defined in Section 50093, or subject to an agreement that provides housing subsidies for affordable housing for persons and families of low or moderate income, as defined in Section 50093 or comparable federal statutes.(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that reducing cost in affordable housing development is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Section 1 of this act adding Section 17929.1 to the Health and Safety Code applies to all cities, including charter cities.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution for certain costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district because, in that regard, this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.However, if the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains other costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.